California, session 20252026, SB1385.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 301.6 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:301.6. The Employment Development Department shall have the possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, appropriations, land, and other property property, real or personal personal, held for the benefit or use of the State Department of Benefit Payments in the performance of the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction that are vested in the Employment Development Department by Section 301.